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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLESTABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI6XH-03

DTC

C1233/33,C 1234/34

Yaw Rate Sensor Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

DTC No.

DTC Detecting Condition

Trouble Area

C1233/33

When any of the following 1. through 4. is detected:
1. ECU terminal IG1 voltage is 9.5 V to 17.0 V, and the

condition that yaw rate sensor voltage is out of the range
from 0.25 V to 4.75 V continued for 1 sec. or more.

2. The conditions that yaw rate sensor open detect circuit

signal is ON and the voltage of ECU terminal IG1 is 9.5
V to 17 V continued for 1 sec. or more.

3. The conditions that yaw rate sensor power source volt-

age is out of the range from 4.4 V to 5.6 V and the volt-
age of ECU terminal IG1 is 9.5 V to 17 V continued for 1
sec. or more.

4. When the condition that yaw rate sensor signal is mo-

mentarily open occurs 10times or more and the voltage
of ECU terminal IG1is 9.5V to 17 V.

C1234/34

Condition 1. or 2. is detected:
1. When the condition that yaw rate sensor VYS terminal

voltage is 4.75 V to 5.25 V and YD malfunction signal of
yaw rate sensor is ON continued for 5 sec. or more.

2. Shift lever position is in P range and output voltage of

yaw rate sensoris outoftherangefrom2.4Vto2.6 V

or after the difference from zero point calibration voltage
of yaw rate sensor has become 0.08 V or more and
when the condition that the vehicle speed exceeds more
than 15 km/h (9 mph) while output condition of yaw rate
sensor has been repeated more than 3 times.

*Yawrate sensor

e Yaw rate sensor circuit

WIRING DIAGRAM

Deceleration Sensor

Skid Control ECU
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BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Perform zero point calibration of the yaw rate sensor (See page DI-185).

-

2 [Is DTC still output?

Check DTC on page DI-185.

YES

N0> No problem.

3 | Check output value of the yaw rate sensor.

F12727

F13720

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP

(RM970E)

Incaseofusingthehand -heldtester:
PREPARATION:
(@ Remove the 2 bolts and yaw rate sensor with connector
still connected.
(b) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.
(c) Turntheignition switchto ON and pushthe hand -held
tester main switch to ON.
(d) Selectthe DATALIST mode onthe hand -heldtester.
CHECK:
Check that the yaw rate value of the yaw rate sensor displayed
onthehand -heldtesterchanges. Placetheyaw rate sensor
vertically to the ground and turn the sensor pivoted on its center.
OK:
Yaw rate value must be changing.

Incaseofnotusingthehand -heldtester:

PREPARATION:

(@ Remove the yaw rate sensor with the connector still con-
nected to it.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch to ON.

CHECK:

Measure voltage betweenterminals YAW2 (1) - GYAW (5),and

terminalsYD (6) - GYAW (5) ofthe yaw rate sensor.
OK:

Terminals 1 and 5

About2.42V - 258V
(YAW2 — GYAW) bou %8

Terminals 6 and 5

About4.5V - 53V
(YD - GYAW) ou
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BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM
OK \

4 | Check voltage between terminals YD and GND of skid control ECU.

NG> Replace yaw rate sensor.

ON PREPARATION:
@ Remove the skid control ECU with the connector still con-
GND Y,D nected.
00000 0O 00000 Os /EI HHHHH%E%%% CHE_CK:
s anilei) sl ellani) { eiisi e alen (eialeale (@  Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Measure voltage between terminals YD and GND of skid
control ECU.
o OK:
() \\_// (+) F02864 Voltage: 4.5 -5.3V

0K> Check and replace skid control ECU.

5 | Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between yaw rate
sensor and skid control ECU (See page IN-38).

@

Check and replace skid control ECU.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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